Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2311
Licensed practitioner, defined.

Licensed practitioner means any podiatrist, dentist, physician, or osteopathic physician licensed to prescribe, diagnose, and treat as provided in the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 1981, LB 379, § 9;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 34;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1712;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 803.